Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.140

County lands assessment fund created—Amount of levy.

The amount of the levy in any year for the county lands assessment fund shall not exceed the estimated amount needed over and above all moneys on hand in the fund, to pay the aggregate amount of such assessments falling due against the lands in the ensuing year; and in no event shall the levy exceed twelve and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value upon all taxable property in the county.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 31; 1963 c 4 s 36.33.140. Prior: 1929 c 193 s 3; RRS s 4027-3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.